Utah statutes.
54-17-303.   Cost recovery.
(1) (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the commission
approves a significant energy resource decision under Section 54-17-302, the
commission shall, in a general rate case or other appropriate commission
proceeding, include in the affected electrical utility's retail electric rates
the state's share of costs:
(i)  relevant to the proceeding;
(ii)  incurred by the affected electrical utility in constructing or acquiring
the approved significant energy resource; and
(iii)  up to the projected costs specified in the commission's order issued
under Section 54-17-302.
(b) (i)  The commission shall, in a general rate case or other appropriate
commission proceeding, include in the affected electrical utility's retail
electric rates the state's share of the incremental cost relevant to the
proceeding that were prudently incurred by the affected electrical utility to
identify, evaluate, and submit a reasonable benchmark option, whether or not
the benchmark option is selected or becomes operational.
(ii)  A recoverable cost under Subsection (1)(b)(i) shall be included in the
affected electrical utility's project costs for the purpose of evaluating the
project's cost-effectiveness.
(iii)  A recoverable cost under Subsection (1)(b)(i) may not be added to the
cost or otherwise considered in the evaluation of a project proposed by any
person other than the affected electrical utility for the purpose of
evaluating that person's proposal.
(c)  Except to the extent that the commission enters an order under Section
54-17-304, an increase from the projected costs specified in the commission's
order issued under Section 54-17-302 shall be subject to review by the
commission as part of a rate hearing under Section 54-7-12.
(2) (a)  Subsequent to the commission issuing an order described in Subsection
(2)(a)(i) or (ii),  the commission may disallow some or all costs incurred in
connection with an approved significant energy resource decision if the
commission finds that an affected electrical utility's actions in implementing
an approved significant energy resource decision are not prudent because of
new information or changed circumstances that occur after:
(i)  the commission's approval of the significant energy resource decisions
under Section 54-17-302; or
(ii)  a commission order to proceed under Section 54-17-304.
(b)  In making a determination of prudence under Subsection (2)(a), the
commission shall use the standards identified in Section 54-4-4.
(3)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the commission may
disallow some or all of the costs incurred by an affected electrical utility
in connection with an approved significant energy resource decision upon a
finding by the commission that the affected electrical utility is responsible
for a material misrepresentation or concealment in connection with an approval
process under this chapter.
